Oklahoma, session 2025, SB988.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 12A O.S. 2021, Section 1-9-320.2,
is amended to read as follows:
Section 1-9-320.2.
DEFINITIONS; REQUISITES OF AN
EFFECTIVE FINANCING STATEMENT

As used in this section and Sections 1-9-320.1 through 1-9-320.7
of this title:
(a) “Buyer in the ordinary course of business” means a
person who, in the ordinary course of business, buys
farm products from a person engaged in farming
operations who is in the business of selling farm
products.
(b) “Central filing system” means a system for filing
effective financing statements on a statewide basis
and which has been certified by the Secretary of the
United States Department of Agriculture.
(c) “Commission merchant” means any person engaged in the
business of receiving any farm product for sale, on
commission, or for or on behalf of another person.
(d) “Effective financing statement” means a statement
that:
(i) is an original or reproduced form consistent with
the provisions of this act and approved by the
Secretary of State Oklahoma County Clerk;
(ii) is signed and filed with the Secretary of State
Oklahoma County Clerk by the secured party;
(iii) is signed by the debtor;
(iv) contains:
(A) the name and address of the secured party,
(B) the name and address of the person indebted
to the secured party,
(C) the social security number of the debtor or,
in the case of a debtor doing business other
than as an individual, the Internal Revenue
Service taxpayer identification number of
such debtor,
ENR. S. B. NO. 988 Page 2

(D) the farm product name,
(E) each county in this state where the farm
product is produced or to be produced or a
blanket code covering all 77 Oklahoma
counties,
(F) a description of the farm products subject
to the security interest only if needed to
distinguish it from other such farm products
owned by the same person or persons but not
subject to the particular interest; and
(G) the crop year, unless every crop of the farm
product in question, for the duration of the
effective financing statement, is to be
subject to the particular security
interest.;
(v) (iv) must be amended in writing, within three
(3) months, similarly signed and filed, to
reflect material changes;
(vi) (v) remains effective for a period of five (5)
years from the date of filing, subject to
extensions for additional periods of five (5)
years each by refiling or filing a continuation
statement within six (6) months before the
expiration of the initial five-year period;
(vii) (vi) is not removed from the public database but
is not reported as an active files file when the
statement lapses on the expiration of the
effective period of the statement or when a
termination statement from the secured party is
accepted, whichever occurs first;
(viii) (vii) is accompanied by the requisite filing fee
provided for in Section 111 of Title 28 of the
Oklahoma Statutes; and
ENR. S. B. NO. 988 Page 3

(ix) (viii) substantially complies with the
requirements of this paragraph even though it
contains minor errors that are not seriously
misleading.; and
(x) (ix) may reflect multiple products or products
in multiple counties.
(e) “Farm product” means an agricultural commodity such as
wheat, corn, soybeans, or a species of livestock such
as cattle, hogs, sheep, horses, or poultry used or
produced in farming operations, or a product of such
crop or livestock in its unmanufactured state (such as
ginned cotton, wool-clip, maple syrup, milk, and
eggs), that is in the possession of a person engaged
in farming operations.
(f) “Knows” or “knowledge” means actual knowledge.
(g) “Person” means any individual, partnership,
corporation, limited liability company, trust, or any
other business entity.
(h) “Security interest” means an interest in farm products
that secures payment or performance of an obligation.
(i) “Selling agent” means any person, other than a
commission merchant, who is engaged in the business of
negotiating the sale and purchase of any farm product
on behalf of a person engaged in farming operations.
(2) Unless otherwise provided for in this act, for purposes of
this section and Sections 4 and 6 of this act, receipt of notice
shall be presumed if notice is sent by first-class mail, postage
prepaid.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 12A O.S. 2021, Section 1-9-320.3,
is amended to read as follows:
Section 1-9-320.3.
FORMS; DUTY OF SECRETARY OF STATE OKLAHOMA COUNTY CLERK
ENR. S. B. NO. 988 Page 4

The Secretary of State Oklahoma County Clerk shall develop and
maintain a standard form for an effective financing statement and
for a statement of continuation, partial release, amendment, or
assignment thereof, which shall be consistent with the provisions of
Sections 1-9-320.1 through 1-9-320.7 of this title.
SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 12A O.S. 2021, Section 1-9-320.4,
is amended to read as follows:
Section 1-9-320.4.
PROTECTION OF BUYERS OF FARM PRODUCTS,
COMMISSION MERCHANTS AND SELLING AGENTS
A buyer of farm products, commission merchant, or selling agent
who purchases or sells farm products in the ordinary course of
business from or for a person engaged in farming operations takes
subject to a security interest in the farm products if:
(a) (i) the buyer of the farm products, commission merchant,
or selling agent has failed to register with the
Secretary of State Oklahoma County Clerk prior to the
purchase of the farm products and the secured party
has filed an effective financing statement that covers
the farm products being sold; or
(ii) the buyer of farm products, commission merchant or
selling agent receives from the Secretary of State
Oklahoma County Clerk written notice as provided in
paragraph (d) or (f) of subsection (4) of Section 1-9-
320.6 of this title, and the buyer of farm products,
commission merchant or selling agent does not secure a
waiver or release of the security interest specified
in an effective financing statement from the secured
party by performing any payment obligation or
otherwise; or
(b) the secured party or the seller provides written notice of
the security interest pursuant to the provisions of Section
1-9-320.7 of this title.
ENR. S. B. NO. 988 Page 5

SECTION 4. AMENDATORY 12A O.S. 2021, Section 1-9-320.6,
as amended by Section 1, Chapter 109, O.S.L. 2022 (12A O.S. Supp.
2024, Section 1-9-320.6), is amended to read as follows:
Section 1-9-320.6.
CENTRAL FILING SYSTEM RELATING TO FARM PRODUCTS
(1) The Secretary of State Oklahoma County Clerk shall be
responsible for developing and implementing maintaining the central
filing system. This responsibility shall include obtaining the
necessary certification for the system from the United States
Department of Agriculture (“USDA”) (USDA). The effective date for
the implementation of the central filing system was October 24, 1988
shall be one hundred eighty (180) days from the certification of the
central filing system by the USDA.
(2) The Secretary of State Oklahoma County Clerk may
promulgate, in accordance with the applicable provisions of the
Administrative Procedures Act, laws governing business within its
office, appropriate rules and practices of the filing office in
harmony with the rules and practices of filing offices in other
jurisdictions that enact substantially this part and to keep the
technology used by the filing office compatible with the technology
used by filing offices in other jurisdictions that enact
substantially this part. The Oklahoma County Clerk, so far as is
consistent with the purposes, policies, and provisions of this
article in adopting, amending, and repealing filing office rules,
shall:
(a) consult with filing offices in other jurisdictions
that enact substantially this part,
(b) consult the International Association of Commercial
Administrators or any successor organization, and
(c) take into consideration the rules and practices of,
and the technology used by, filing offices in other
jurisdictions that enact substantially this part, for
the implementation and operation of the central filing
system.
ENR. S. B. NO. 988 Page 6

(3) The Office of Management and Enterprise Services shall
assist the Secretary of State in developing and implementing the
central filing system.
(4) The central filing system shall conform to the following
requirements:
(a) The Secretary of State Oklahoma County Clerk shall
record the date and, hour, minute, and second of the
filing of each effective financing statement;
(b) The Secretary of State Oklahoma County Clerk shall
compile all effective financing statements into a
master list:
(i) organized according to farm products;
(ii) arranged within each such product:
(A) in alphabetical order according to the last
name of the individual debtors or, in the
case of debtors doing business other than as
individuals, the first word in the name of
the debtors;
(B) in numerical order according to the Social
Security number of the individual debtors
or, in the case of debtors doing business
other than as individuals, the Internal
Revenue Service taxpayer identification
number of the debtors;
(C) geographically by county produced; and
(D) by crop year; and
(iii) containing the information provided for in
subparagraph (iv) of paragraph (d) of Section 1-
9-320.2 of this title;
(iv) portions of the master list shall be available in
hard copy, electronic formats, or via Internet
ENR. S. B. NO. 988 Page 7

download, and may be organized by other sorting
methods in addition to the methods listed above.
(c) The Secretary of State Oklahoma County Clerk shall
maintain records of all buyers of farm products,
commission merchants, selling agents and others who
register with the Secretary of State Oklahoma County
Clerk, on a form containing:
(i) the name and address of each registrant;
(ii) the information on the farm product or products
that the registrant is requesting;
(iii) the name of each county where the product is
produced or to be produced, or a blanket code
covering all seventy-seven (77) counties of this
state; and
(iv) an authorized signature.
(d) (i) A copy of those portions of the master list
covering the information requested by a
registrant shall be distributed to such
registrants by the Secretary of State Oklahoma
County Clerk on or before the last business day
of each month and shall be presumed to have been
received by the third business day of the
following month.
(ii) Registrants shall be deemed to be registered only
as to those portions of the master list for which
they register, and shall be deemed to have failed
to register and shall not be considered to be
registrants as to those portions for which they
do not register.
(iii) Registrants are subject only to security
interests shown on the portions of the master
list which they receive as a consequence of
registration with the Secretary of State Oklahoma
County Clerk.
ENR. S. B. NO. 988 Page 8

(iv) If a particular security interest is shown on the
master list, but was included since the last
regular distribution of portions of the master
list to registrants, registrants shall not be
subject to that security interest;
(e) The duration of the registration with the Secretary of
State Oklahoma County Clerk of a buyer of farm
products, commission merchant, selling agent or other
registrant shall be one (1) year from the effective
date of the registration with the Secretary of State
Oklahoma County Clerk.
(f) (i) Upon request, within twenty-four (24) hours of
any inquiry, for information, the Secretary of
State Oklahoma County Clerk shall provide verbal
confirmation of the existence or nonexistence of
any effective financing statement on file. By
the close of the business day following the day
on which the request was received, written
confirmation of the existence of an effective
financing statement will be provided to buyers of
farm products, commission merchants, and selling
agents who have not registered, and others who
request it.
(ii) The state or political subdivision shall not be
liable if a loss or claim results from any
confirmation of the existence or nonexistence of
any effective financing statement on file in the
Office of the Secretary of State Oklahoma County
Clerk’s office made in good faith by an employee
of the Office of the Secretary of State Oklahoma
County Clerk’s office as required by the
provisions of this section.
(5) (4) The filing in the office of the Secretary of State
Oklahoma County Clerk under this section shall be in addition to the
filing requirements provided for in this article.
ENR. S. B. NO. 988 Page 9

(6) (5) A financing or continuation statement covering farm
products that has not lapsed and which was filed pursuant to this
title between December 23, 1986, and October 24, 1988, inclusive,
and for which no written notice was furnished as provided in Section
1-9-320.7 of this title, shall become ineffective as to a buyer of
farm products, commission merchant or selling agent, unless the
secured party files an effective financing statement in the office
of the Secretary of State Oklahoma County Clerk.
(7) (6) An effective financing statement shall not be deemed
filed in accordance with the provisions of this section until all
fees authorized by Section 111 of Title 28 of the Oklahoma Statutes
relating to the filing of the statement are tendered to the
Secretary of State Oklahoma County Clerk.
(8) (7) The secured party shall file a termination statement
within twenty (20) days after there is no outstanding secured
obligation or commitment to make advances, incur obligations or
otherwise give value. The termination statement shall refer to the
unique document ID number. The secured party shall not be required
to file a termination statement if the debtor, in writing, addressed
to the secured party, requests that a termination not be filed. The
request shall be signed by the debtor or an authorized
representative and the request may be made at any time prior to the
expiration date of an effective financing statement set forth
herein. If the affected secured party fails to file a termination
statement as required by this subsection, the party shall be liable
to the Secretary of State Oklahoma County Clerk for Five Hundred
Dollars ($500.00). In addition the affected secured party shall be
liable to the debtor for any loss caused to the debtor by the
failure to terminate the effective financing statement.
(9) (8) The Attorney General Oklahoma County District Attorney
shall be responsible for enforcing the provisions of subsection (8)
(7) of this section on behalf of the Secretary of State Oklahoma
County Clerk and is authorized to take appropriate actions to
collect any penalties owed to the Secretary of State Oklahoma County
Clerk pursuant to subsection (8) (7) of this section. When
collected, the Oklahoma County District Attorney General shall cause
the penalty to be deposited into the Central Filing System Revolving
Fund Oklahoma County Clerk’s Uniform Commercial Code Central Filing
ENR. S. B. NO. 988 Page 10

Fund created pursuant to Section 276.3 of Title 62 of the Oklahoma
Statutes Section 1-9-525.1 of Title 12A of the Oklahoma Statutes.
(9) As the purpose of an effective financing statement filing
is to ensure that a joint check is made payable to the debtor and
all applicable secured parties, there shall be no priority among
filings. Filings shall be processed according to the order in which
they were filed, as recorded in a timestamp within the filing.
(10) All active filings on the effective date of this act, as
provided in paragraph (1) of this section, shall be filed with the
Oklahoma County Clerk’s office. Each active filing that is filed
pursuant to the requirements of this paragraph shall be accompanied
with a transition document that shall be provided by the Oklahoma
County Clerk’s office. The Oklahoma County Clerk’s office shall
charge no fee for active filings that are migrated to the system
maintained by the Oklahoma County Clerk.
SECTION 5. AMENDATORY 12A O.S. 2021, Section 1-9-525, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1-9-525.
FEES
(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (e) of this
section, the fee for filing and indexing a record under this part,
other than an initial financing statement of the kind described in
subsection (c) of Section 1-9-502 of this title, is:
(1) Ten Dollars ($10.00) if the record is communicated in
writing and consists of one to five pages, and an additional One
Dollar ($1.00) per page for each page exceeding five; and
(2) Ten Dollars ($10.00) if the record is communicated by an
electronic medium authorized by filing-office rule.
(b) The number of names required to be indexed does not affect
the amount of the fee in subsection (a) of this section.
(c) The fee for responding to a request for information from
the filing office in any medium designated by the filing office,
ENR. S. B. NO. 988 Page 11

including issuing a certificate showing whether there is on file any
financing statement naming a particular debtor, is Ten Dollars
($10.00) for each debtor.
(d) The fee for a copy of a record is One Dollar ($1.00) per
page regardless of the medium used.
(e) This section does not require a fee with respect to a
record of a mortgage which is effective as a financing statement
filed as a fixture filing or as a financing statement covering as-
extracted collateral or timber to be cut under subsection (c) of
Section 1-9-502 of this title. However, the recording and
satisfaction fees that otherwise would be applicable to the record
of the mortgage apply pursuant to paragraphs 1, 2, 4, 7, 11, 15 and
16 of subsection A of Section 32 of Title 28 of the Oklahoma
Statutes.
(f) The fee for providing certified copies shall be One Dollar
($1.00) per page regardless of medium.
(g) The fee for providing bulk data of indexed records as
described in subsection (f) of Section 1-9-523 of this title is as
follows:
(1) Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) for the initial database
history.
(2) Fifty Dollars ($50.00) for weekly updates to the database.
(3) Four cents ($0.04) per page for images of filed records.
(h) The filing office may accept payment for fees by automated
clearing house or by a nationally recognized debit or credit card.
If payment is made by a credit or debit card, the filing office may
add an amount equal to the amount of the service charge incurred for
the acceptance of the payment. The filing office may enter into
contracts for credit card processing services according to
applicable county purchasing laws or may enter into agreements with
the State Treasurer to participate in any credit card processing
agreements entered into by the State Treasurer.
ENR. S. B. NO. 988 Page 12

(i) In addition to the other fees provided by law, the Oklahoma
County Clerk shall, upon the effective date of the central filing
system provided for in Section 1-9-320.6 of this title, collect the
following fees:
(1) For filing an effective financing statement in the Oklahoma
County Clerk’s office pursuant to Section 1-9-320.6 of this title,
Ten Dollars ($10.00);
(2) For filing a continuation statement, partial release, or
assignment of or amendment to an effective financing statement filed
in the Oklahoma County Clerk’s office pursuant to Section 1-9-320.6
of this title, Ten Dollars ($10.00);
(3) For filing a termination statement for an effective
financing statement filed in the Oklahoma County Clerk’s office
pursuant to Section 1-9-320.6 of this title, Ten Dollars ($10.00);
(4) For registering a buyer of farm products, commission
merchant, selling agent, or other interested party as provided for
in Section 1-9-320.6 of this title, Fifty Dollars ($50.00) per year.
The registration fee provided for in this paragraph shall not apply
if the buyer of farm products, commission merchant, selling agent,
or other interested party as provided for in Section 1-9-320.6 of
this title accesses the master list through Internet download;
(5) For distributing a copy of the master list or portions
thereof to registrants, as provided for in Section 1-9-320.6 of this
title, in accordance with the following fee schedule. Such fees may
be paid annually or semiannually:
(A) For information requested for five or fewer counties:
Number of Farm
Products Paper
(i) 1 to 5 products ............$150 per year
(ii) 6 to 10 products ...........$200 per year
(iii) 11 to 20 products ..........$250 per year
ENR. S. B. NO. 988 Page 13

(iv) over 20 products ...........$300 per year
(B) For information requested for six to twenty-five
counties:
Number of Farm
Products Paper
(i) 1 to 10 products ...........$200 per year
(ii) 11 to 20 products ..........$250 per year
(iii) over 20 products ...........$300 per year
(C) For information requested for twenty-six to fifty
counties:
Number of Farm
Products Paper
(i) 1 to 10 products ...........$250 per year
(ii) 11 to 20 products ..........$300 per year
(iii) over 20 products ...........$350 per year
(D) For information requested for over fifty counties:
Number of Farm
Products Paper
(i) 1 to 10 products ...........$300 per year
(ii) 11 to 20 products ..........$350 per year
(iii) over 20 products ..........$400 per year;
(6) (A) The Oklahoma County Clerk is authorized to provide for
the distribution of the master list or portions
thereof to those persons specified in paragraph 5 of
this subsection through Internet download, electronic
data equipment, or other communication media in such
ENR. S. B. NO. 988 Page 14

form and manner as is specified by the Oklahoma County
Clerk. The Oklahoma County Clerk shall not collect a
fee for distribution of the master list or portions
thereof through Internet download.
(B) The Oklahoma County Clerk is authorized to establish a
fee system for such transfer of information pursuant
to this paragraph. Such fee shall not exceed the
amount necessary to cover the costs of the Oklahoma
County Clerk in providing such transfer of
information.
(C) In providing for the transfer of the information
specified by this paragraph, the Oklahoma County Clerk
shall ensure the integrity of confidential information
through data security measures, internal controls, and
appropriate database management; and
(7) For issuing a written confirmation of the existence or
nonexistence of active effective financing statements on file for a
debtor in the Oklahoma County Clerk’s office, Six Dollars ($6.00).
(j) All fees shall be properly accounted for and shall be paid
to the Oklahoma County Clerk monthly. The fees generated by
subsection (i) of this section shall be deposited to the credit of
the Oklahoma County Clerk’s Uniform Commercial Code Central Filing
Fund created pursuant to Section 1-9-525.1 of this title.
SECTION 6. AMENDATORY 28 O.S. 2021, Section 111, as
amended by Section 2, Chapter 109, O.S.L. 2022 (28 O.S. Supp. 2024,
Section 111), is amended to read as follows:
Section 111. A. In addition to other fees provided for by law,
the Secretary of State shall collect the following fees:
1. For affixing the certificate of the Secretary of State and
the seal of the State of Oklahoma, Ten Dollars ($10.00);
2. For copying any paper or document, One Dollar ($1.00) per
page, provided the minimum charge shall not be less than Two Dollars
($2.00);
ENR. S. B. NO. 988 Page 15

3. For filing an effective financing statement in the Office of
the Secretary of State pursuant to Section 1-9-320.6 of Title 12A of
the Oklahoma Statutes, prior to the effective date of the central
filing system provided in Section 1-9-320.6 of Title 12A of the
Oklahoma Statutes, Ten Dollars ($10.00);
4. For filing a continuation statement, partial release,
assignment of or amendment to an effective financing statement filed
in the Office of the Secretary of State pursuant to Section 1-9-
320.6 of Title 12A of the Oklahoma Statutes, prior to the effective
date of the central filing system provided in Section 1-9-320.6 of
Title 12A of the Oklahoma Statutes, Ten Dollars ($10.00);
5. For filing a termination statement for an effective
financing statement filed in the Office of the Secretary of State
pursuant to Section 1-9-320.6 of Title 12A of the Oklahoma Statutes,
prior to the effective date of the central filing system provided in
Section 1-9-320.6 of Title 12A of the Oklahoma Statutes, Ten Dollars
($10.00);
6. For registering a buyer of farm products, commission
merchant, selling agent or other interested party as provided for in
Section 1-9-320.6 of Title 12A of the Oklahoma Statutes, prior to
the effective date of the central filing system provided in Section
1-9-320.6 of Title 12A of the Oklahoma Statutes, Fifty Dollars
($50.00) per year. The registration fee provided for in this
paragraph shall not apply if the buyer of farm products, commission
merchant, selling agent, or other interested party as provided for
in Section 1-9-320.6 of Title 12A of the Oklahoma Statutes accesses
the master list through Internet download;
7. For distributing a copy of the master list or portions
thereof to registrants, as provided for in Section 1-9-320.6 of
Title 12A of the Oklahoma Statutes, prior to the effective date of
the central filing system provided in Section 1-9-320.6 of Title 12A
of the Oklahoma Statutes, in accordance with the following fee
schedule. Such fees may be paid annually or semiannually:
a. For information requested for five or less counties:
Number of Farm
Products Paper
ENR. S. B. NO. 988 Page 16

(1) 1 to 5 products ............$150 per year
(2) 6 to 10 products ...........$200 per year
(3) 11 to 20 products ..........$250 per year
(4) over 20 products ...........$300 per year
b. For information requested for six to twenty-five
counties:
Number of Farm
Products Paper
(1) 1 to 10 products ...........$200 per year
(2) 11 to 20 products ..........$250 per year
(3) over 20 products ...........$300 per year
c. For information requested for twenty-six to fifty
counties:
Number of Farm
Products Paper
(1) 1 to 10 products ...........$250 per year
(2) 11 to 20 products ..........$300 per year
(3) over 20 products ...........$350 per year
d. For information requested for over fifty counties:
Number of Farm
Products Paper
(1) 1 to 10 products ...........$300 per year
(2) 11 to 20 products ..........$350 per year
ENR. S. B. NO. 988 Page 17

(3) over 20 products ..........$400 per year;
8. a. The Secretary of State, prior to the effective date of
the central filing system provided in Section 1-9-
320.6 of Title 12A of the Oklahoma Statutes, is
authorized to provide for the distribution of the
master list or portions thereof to those persons
specified in paragraph 7 of this subsection through
Internet download, electronic data equipment, or other
communication media in such form and manner as is
specified by the Secretary of State. The Secretary of
State shall not collect a fee for distribution of the
master list or portions thereof through Internet
download.
b. The Secretary of State, prior to the effective date of
the central filing system provided in Section 1-9-
320.6 of Title 12A of the Oklahoma Statutes, is
authorized to establish a fee system for such transfer
of information pursuant to this paragraph. Such fee
shall not exceed the amount necessary to cover the
costs of the Secretary of State in providing such
transfer of information.
c. In providing for the transfer of the information
specified by this paragraph, the Secretary of State
shall ensure the integrity of confidential information
within the Office of the Secretary of State through
data security measures, internal controls and
appropriate data base management;
9. For issuing a written confirmation of the existence or
nonexistence of active effective financing statements on file for a
debtor in the Office of the Secretary of State, prior to the
effective date of the central filing system provided in Section 1-9-
320.6 of Title 12A of the Oklahoma Statutes, Six Dollars ($6.00);
10. The Secretary of State shall collect a fee of Twenty-five
Dollars ($25.00) for every apostille issued. For the purposes of
this paragraph, an apostille is a special certificate attached to a
public record, as required by the 1961 Hague Convention, Fed. R.
Civ. P. 44 (28 U.S.C.A.), to certify the authenticity of the
ENR. S. B. NO. 988 Page 18

signature, the capacity in which the person signing the document has
acted and, where appropriate, the identity of the seal or stamp
which it bears; provided, however, a fee of Ten Dollars ($10.00)
shall be collected for any apostille requested for an international
adoption not to exceed One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) for the
adoption of each child; and
11. For each service rendered and not specified in this
section, such fees as are allowed for similar services in other
cases.
B. All fees shall be properly accounted for and shall be paid
into the State Treasury monthly. The fees generated by paragraphs
1, 2, 10 and 11 of subsection A of this section shall be deposited
to the credit of the Revolving Fund for the Office of the Secretary
of State created pursuant to Section 276.1 of Title 62 of the
Oklahoma Statutes. The fees generated by paragraphs 3 through 9 of
subsection A of this section and other fees collected by the central
filing system shall be deposited to the credit of the Central Filing
System Revolving Fund created pursuant to Section 276.3 of Title 62
of the Oklahoma Statutes.
SECTION 7. This act shall become effective one hundred eighty
(180) days from the certification of the central filing system by
the USDA, pursuant to the implementation effective date set forth in
Section 1-9-320.6 of Title 12A of the Oklahoma Statutes. Upon the
occurrence of such implementation, the Oklahoma County Clerk shall
issue a formal notification to the President Pro Tempore of the
Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the Governor,
and the Secretary of State indicating that the contingency has been
met and the amendments shall take effect.
ENR. S. B. NO. 988 Page 19

Passed the Senate the 20th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 30th day of April, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 988 Page 20